Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2506
Secretary of State; cancel registration; when.

The Secretary of State shall cancel from the register:

(1) Any registration for which the Secretary of State receives a voluntary request for cancellation from the registrant or the assignee of record;

(2) All registrations granted under the Name Protection Act upon completion of the term of ten years from the date of registration;

(3) Any registration concerning which a court of competent jurisdiction finds:

(a) That the registration was granted improperly; or

(b) That the registration was obtained fraudulently; or

(4) Any registration which a court of competent jurisdiction orders canceled on any ground.

Laws 1986, LB 1025, § 6.